Massachusetts, session 194th, S1029.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (f) of section 2A of chapter 211D of the General Laws is hereby
amended by striking out in the first two sentences, each time it appears, the figure “$150” and
inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- $100.
SECTION 2. Said subsection (f) of said section 2A of said chapter 211D is hereby further
amended by striking out in the first two sentences, each time it appears, the figure “$100” and
inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- $50.
SECTION 3. Said section 2A of said chapter 211D is hereby further amended by striking
out subsection (f), and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
(f) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no person determined to
be indigent shall be assessed a counsel fee.
of 2

SECTION 4. Section 1 of this act shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. Section 2 of this act shall take effect on July 1, 2028.
SECTION 6. Section 3 of this act shall take effect on July 1, 2029.
of 2